Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-101.02
Inmate communications; Jail Standards Board; duties.

The Jail Standards Board shall ensure that county jails are providing inmates with means to communicate by telephone or videoconferencing with inmates' families, loved ones, and counsel.

Laws 2018, LB776, § 3.